New Jersey, session 222, A5263.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.         For the purpose of this section: Serious hazard affecting habitability or  serious hazard means a deficiency in a vital facility, including, but not limited to, mold, unsafe staircases, missing or nonfunctional locks, broken toilets, lack of hot or cold water, lack of electricity, or broken heating system. b.  A residential tenant may remit rent payments into a separate escrow account if, after providing notification to the landlord and reasonable time for repairs to occur, a serious hazard affecting habitability persists within the tenants dwelling unit or the dwelling unit property.  Upon completion of repairs to address a serious hazard the tenant shall provide due payments to the landlord from the escrow account. c.     Payment of residential rent into an escrow account following the persistence of a serious hazard shall not be considered grounds for eviction as a default of rent payment or other grounds for eviction pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1974, c.49 (C.2A:18-61.1). 2.    a.         If a residential landlord fails to make repairs of facilities within a dwelling unit that are necessary to maintain habitability after being given written notification and a reasonable time to make a repair, including, but not limited to, repairs involving mold, unsafe staircases, or broken heating system, a residential tenant may make arrangements for repair and further deduct the cost of repair in an amount up to four months of rent payments under the terms of the residential lease. b.    Deduction of rent from the cost of repairs made by a tenant shall not be considered grounds for eviction as a default of rent payment or other grounds for eviction pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1974, c.49 (C.2A:18-61.1). 3.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the first month after enactment.